Utah statutes.
67-19a-301.   Charges submissible under grievance procedure.

(1)  This grievance procedure may only be used by career service employees who are not:

(a)  public applicants for a position with the state's work force;

(b)  public employees of the state's political subdivisions;

(c)  public employees covered by other grievance procedures; or

(d)  employees of state institutions of higher education.

(2) (a)  Whenever a question or dispute exists as to whether an employee is qualified to use this grievance procedure, the administrator shall resolve the question or dispute.

(b)  The administrator's decision under Subsection (2)(a) is reviewable only by the Court of Appeals.

(3)  Any career service employee may submit a grievance based upon a claim or charge of injustice or oppression, including dismissal from employment, resulting from an act, occurrence, omission, or condition for solution through the grievance procedures set forth in this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2010 General Session

